Hawaii statutes.
[§28-152] Law enforcement officer
independent review board; established. (a) There is established a law
enforcement officer independent review board that is placed within the
department of the attorney general for administrative purposes only. The board
shall be responsible for reviewing criminal
investigations of incidents of officer-involved death conducted by law
enforcement agencies and issuing recommendations to the prosecuting attorney of
the county in which the incident occurred.

(b) The board shall consist of nine members as
follows:

(1) One deputy attorney general;

(2) One former prosecuting attorney or deputy
prosecuting attorney who served in that capacity with the department of the
prosecuting attorney for the city and county of Honolulu;

(3) One former prosecuting attorney or deputy
prosecuting attorney who served in that capacity with the department of the
prosecuting attorney for the county of Maui;

(4) One former prosecuting attorney or deputy
prosecuting attorney who served in that capacity with the office of the
prosecuting attorney for Hawaii county;

(5) One former prosecuting attorney or deputy
prosecuting attorney who served in that capacity with the office of the
prosecuting attorney for the county of Kauai;

(6) One retired justice or judge of a state court in
the State to be appointed by the governor without regard to the requirements of
section 26-34;

(7) One former chief of police, former sheriff,
former chief deputy chief of police, or former chief deputy sheriff to be appointed by the governor without regard to the
requirements of section 26-34; and

(8) Two community members
to be appointed as follows:

(A) One community member to be appointed by
the governor without regard to the requirements of section 26-34; and

(B) One community member to be appointed by
the attorney general;

provided that the
community members shall not have law enforcement or criminal justice
experience.

(c) Except for
members designated by subsection (b)(8), each member of the board shall have at
least five years' experience investigating, prosecuting, or presiding over
criminal cases involving death.

(d) Unless otherwise provided, the members of
the board shall be appointed by the attorney general.

(e) The members of the board shall serve
without compensation for terms specified by the
appointing authority, but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including
travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their duties.

(f) Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, no member shall be liable in any civil action founded
upon a statute or the case law of this State, for damage, injury, or loss
caused by or resulting from the member's performance of [or] failure to perform
any duty that is required or authorized to be performed by a person holding the
position to which the member was appointed, unless the member acted with a
malicious or improper purpose, except when the plaintiff in a civil action is
the State. [L 2016, c 161, pt of §1]

Note

Law enforcement officer independent review board; report on
activities to 2022 legislature. L 2016, c 161, §3.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next